Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 29 MONEY TRANSMISSION
§ 26-2920. Revocation or suspension of authorized representatives.

If, after notice and a hearing, the director finds that any authorized representative of a licensee or any director, officer, employee, or controlling person of such authorized representative:

Has violated any provision of this chapter, or of any rule or order issued under the provisions of this chapter;

Has engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of selling or issuing payment instruments of the licensee or the business of money transmission; or

Has made or caused to be made in any application or report filed with the director or in any proceeding before the director, any statement which was at the time and in the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or has omitted to state in any such application or report any material fact which is required to be stated therein, the director may issue an order suspending or barring such authorized representative from continuing to be or becoming an authorized representative of any licensee during the period for which such order is in effect. Upon issuance of such order, the licensee shall terminate its relationship with such authorized representative according to the terms of the order.

Any authorized representative to whom an order is issued under the provisions of this section may apply to the director to modify or rescind such order. The director shall not grant such application unless the director finds that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that such person will, if and when such person is permitted to resume being an authorized representative of a licensee, comply with all applicable provisions of this chapter and of any rule and order issued under the provisions of this chapter.
(2)(a) Any authorized representative to whom an order is issued under the provisions of this section may apply to the director to modify or rescind such order. The director shall not grant such application unless the director finds that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that such person will, if and when such person is permitted to resume being an authorized representative of a licensee, comply with all applicable provisions of this chapter and of any rule and order issued under the provisions of this chapter.

The right of any authorized representative to whom an order is issued under the provisions of this section to petition for judicial review of such order shall not be affected by the failure of such persons to apply to the director to modify or rescind the order.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2920, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2921. Licensee liability.

A license’s [licensee’s] liability to any person for a money transmission conducted on that person’s behalf by the licensee or the licensee’s authorized representative shall be limited to the amount of money transmitted or the face amount of the payment instrument purchased.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2921, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2922. Hearings — Procedures.

The provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, shall apply to any hearing afforded pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2922, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2923. Civil penalties.

If, after notice and hearing, the director finds that a person has violated the provisions of this chapter or a rule adopted under the provisions of this chapter, the director may order the person to pay to the director a civil penalty in an amount specified by the director, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or, in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation continues, but not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in the aggregate. The provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, shall apply to such hearing.

The director, in his discretion, is authorized to compromise, settle, and collect civil penalties with any person for violations of any provision of this chapter, or of any rule or order issued or promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2923, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2924. Enforcement.

If it appears to the director that any person has committed or is about to commit a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule or order of the director, the director may:

Issue a cease and desist order ordering such person to cease and desist violating or continuing to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order issued in accordance with this chapter; or

Apply to the district court for an order enjoining such person from violating or continuing to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order and for injunctive or such other relief as the nature of the case may require.

The director may enter into consent orders at any time with any person to resolve any matter arising under the provisions of this chapter. A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is issued or a duly authorized representative, and must indicate agreement to the terms contained therein. A consent order need not constitute an admission by any person that any provision of this chapter or any rule or order promulgated or issued thereunder has been violated nor need it constitute a finding by the director that such person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or order promulgated or issued thereunder.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a consent order, the director may seek civil or criminal penalties or compromise civil penalties concerning matters encompassed by the consent order unless the consent order by its terms expressly precludes the director from so doing.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2924, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2925. Criminal penalties.

Any person who knowingly and wilfully violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a felony.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2925, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2926. Promulgation of rules.

All rules promulgated by the director pursuant to authority conferred in this chapter will be in accordance with the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. In addition thereto, at the time the director files a notice of proposed adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule for public comment, a copy of said notice will be sent by regular United States mail, postage prepaid, to all then current licensees and applicants for licenses under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2926, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2927. Severability.

Should any provision, sentence, clause, section or part of this act for any reason be held unconstitutional, illegal or invalid, such unconstitutionality, illegality, or invalidity shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions, sentences, clauses, sections or parts of this act. It is hereby declared to be the intention of this legislature that this act would have been adopted had such unconstitutional, illegal or invalid sentence, clause, section or part thereof not been included herein.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2927, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.

§ 26-2928. Appointment of director as agent for service of process.

Any licensee, authorized representative or other person who knowingly engages in business activities that are regulated under the provisions of this chapter, with or without filing an application, is deemed to have done both the following:

Consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state for all actions arising under the provisions of this chapter; and

Appointed the director as his lawful agent for the purpose of accepting service of process in any action, suit or proceeding that may arise under the provisions of this chapter.

Within three (3) business days after service of process upon the director, the director shall transmit by certified mail copies of all lawful processes accepted by the director as an agent to that person at his last known address. Service of process shall be considered complete three (3) business days after the director deposits copies of the documents in the United States mail.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2928, as added by 1994, ch. 410, § 1, p. 1282.